src/fst/morphology/stems/preverbs.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   PV lexicons start     !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PreverbRoot
SubPV ;
VerbStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   Subordinating PV      !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SubPV
@U.Order.Cnj@ SubPVPlainConjunct ;
TensePV ;

LEXICON SubPVPlainConjunct
ChCnj+:0 ChCnjPV ;
@D.ChCnj@PVSub%/e+:@D.ChCnj@e SubPVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVSub%/a+:@D.ChCnj@a SubPVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVSub%/gaa+:@D.ChCnj@gaa SubPVBoundary ;

LEXICON ChCnjPV
@U.ChCnj.On@ TensePVChangedConjunct ;
@U.ChCnj.On@ DirPVChangedConjunct ;
@U.ChCnj.On@:@U.ChCnj.On@%<ChCnj%> TensePV ;

LEXICON SubPVBoundary
0:- TensePV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        Tense PV         !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON TensePV
TensePVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ TensePVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ TensePVPlainConjunct ;
DirPV ;

LEXICON TensePVAny
PVTense%/gii+:gii%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/gii'+:gii'%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/wii+:wii%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/wii'+:wii'%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/jibwaa+:jibwaa TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/aano+:aano TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/aana+:aana TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVIndependent
PVTense%/ga+:ga TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:daa TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:daa TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVPlainConjunct
@D.ChCnj@PVTense%/ga+:@D.ChCnj@ji TensePVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVTense%/daa+:@D.ChCnj@ji TensePVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVTense%/daa+:@D.ChCnj@da TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVChangedConjunct
PVTense%/ga+:ge TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:ge TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:ge TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVBoundary 
@C.ChCnj@:@C.ChCnj@- TensePV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!     Directional PV      !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON DirPV
DirPVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ DirPVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ DirPVPlainConjunct ;
RelPV ;

LEXICON DirPVAny
PVDir%/ani+:ani DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ini+:ini DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/awi+:awi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/owi+:owi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/baa+:baa DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/babaa+:babaa DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/bibaa+:bibaa DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/biiji+:biiji DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/bi+:bi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/bimi+:bimi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ni+:ni DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/o+:o DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ombi+:ombi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/wi+:wi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/zaagiji+:zaagiji DirPVBoundary ;

LEXICON DirPVIndependent
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON DirPVPlainConjunct
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON DirPVChangedConjunct
PVDir%/bi+:ba DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ni+:eni DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/wi+:wi DirPVBoundary ;

LEXICON DirPVBoundary 
@C.ChCnj@:@C.ChCnj@- DirPV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!       Relative PV       !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON RelPV
RelPVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ RelPVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ RelPVPlainConjunct ;
LexPV ;

LEXICON RelPVAny
PVRel%/ako+:ako RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/apiichi+:apiichi RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/dazhi+:dazhi RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/dazhi+:dazhi RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/daso+:daso RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/onji+:onji RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/izhi+:izhi RelPVBoundary ;

LEXICON RelPVIndependent
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON RelPVPlainConjunct
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON RelPVChangedConjunct
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON RelPVBoundary 
@C.ChCnj@:@C.ChCnj@- RelPV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        Lexical PV       !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON LexPV
LexPVAny ;
PreverbEnd ;

LEXICON LexPVBoundary
0:- LexPV ;

LEXICON PreverbEnd
0:%<%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON LexPVAny
PVLex%/gichi+:gichi LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ningo+:ningo LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niizho+:niizho LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niso+:niso LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aabitawi+:aabitawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aagawi+:aagawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aanike+:aanike LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aaniko+:aanikow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aanji+:aanjiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/agiji+:agijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/agwaa+:agwaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/agaami+:agaamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ando+:nandow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ando+:andow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/anaami+:anaamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/anama'e+:anama'e LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aabiji+:aabijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aako+:aakow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/asabi+:asabiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ashki+:ashkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/awasi+:awasiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/asho+:ashow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/baate+:baate LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/azhe+:azhe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/baataa+:baataa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/baazhiji+:baazhijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bagaki+:bagakiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bagwaji+:bagwajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bagone+:bagone LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bagami+:bagamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bigwaji+:bigwajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bichi+:bichiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bimiji+:bimijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biimisko+:biimiskow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biindige+:biindige LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biitoo+:biitoo LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biinji+:biinjiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bake+:bake LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bizaani+:bizaaniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bishigo+:bishigow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/booni+:booniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/dabasi+:dabasiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/dago+:dagow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/de+:de LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/dibiki+:dibikiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/edawi+:edawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/edawigaam+:edawigaam LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/dinowi+:dinowiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/eyedawi+:eyedawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gaaski+:gaaskiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gabe+:gabe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gaagige+:gaagige LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gagwe+:gagwe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gete+:gete LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gakaki+:gakakiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gashki+:gashkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gagweji+:gagwejiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/geziko+:gezikow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giimooji+:giimoojiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giizhi+:giizhiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gegabe+:gegabe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gichi+:gichiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giizhii+:giizhii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gagwaanisagi+:gagwaanisagiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ginibi+:ginibiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/goji+:gojiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ishkwaa+:ishkwaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gwiinawi+:gwiinawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ishpi+:ishpiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/jaagi+:jaagiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/jiigi+:jiigiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maajii+:maajii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/jiigewe+:jiigewe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maamawoo+:maamawoo LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maazhi+:maazhiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/madaabii+:madaabii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maji+:majiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/manaa+:manaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/megwe+:megwe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/megwaa+:megwaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mayagi+:mayagiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/makade+:makade LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/madwe+:madwe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/misko+:miskow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/miikawaaji+:miikawaajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mino+:minow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/naabe+:naabe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/naaji+:naajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mizhisha+:mizhishaw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/naawi+:naawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/namanji+:namanjiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nabane+:nabane LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nabagi+:nabagiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/michi+:michiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mishi+:mishiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/namaji+:namajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nanda+:nandaw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nibaaji+:nibaajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nazhike+:nazhike LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/niiji+:niijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/niibaa+:niibaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/niminaawe+:niminaawe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nishike+:nishike LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nitaa+:nitaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/noozhe+:noozhe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nooji+:noojiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/noonde+:noonde LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ogiji+:ogijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/niigaani+:niigaaniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ojibwe+:ojibwe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ondami+:ondamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ojaanimi+:ojaanimiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ondaasi+:ondaasiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/onzaami+:onzaamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/opaa+:opaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/opime+:opime LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ozaawi+:ozaawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waasamoo+:waasamoo LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wani+:waniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ozhaawashko+:ozhaawashkow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waawiye+:waawiye LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waabishki+:waabishkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wanako+:wanakow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wagiji+:wagijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wake+:wake LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/oshki+:oshkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wiisagi+:wiisagiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zaabi+:zaabiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wiinge+:wiinge LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zaagiji+:zaagijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wiiji+:wiijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wiishkobi+:wiishkobiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zhiibaa+:zhiibaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zhigaji+:zhigajiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zhiiwi+:zhiiwiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biisi+:biisiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bibine+:bibine LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bigishki+:bigishkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bigii+:bigii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gigizhebaa+:gigizhebaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waabi+:waabiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aabitaa+:aabitaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aapiji+:aapijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gashkii+:gashkii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giiwe+:giiwe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biiwaabiko+:biiwaabikow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zazegaa+:zazegaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gwayako+:gwayakow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waanda+:waandaw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gimooji+:gimoojiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nisawi+:nisawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waasiko+:waasikow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/daki+:dakiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/oke+:oke LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biini+:biiniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waabanoo+:waabanoo LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mangi+:mangiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/eyiidawi+:eyiidawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gijigi+:gijigiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/miigwechiwi+:miigwechiwiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/goshko+:goshkow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/noosooki+:noosookiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aazhawi+:aazhawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/naabi+:naabiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ginwaakojii+:ginwaakojii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biichi+:biichiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/chi+:chiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/agaasi+:agaasiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giiwitaawi+:giiwitaawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giiwitaa+:giiwitaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biisaawangi+:biisaawangiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/besho+:beshow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zhaawani+:zhaawaniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/enendagi+:enendagiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bapagone+:bapagone LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nisibi+:nisibiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ziiwiski+:ziiwiskiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bakobii+:bakobii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nando+:andow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biimi+:biimiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/noogi+:noogiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gawi+:gawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nitami+:nitamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/aabita+:aabitaw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-ishwaaso+:ashi-ishwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-ngodwaaso+:ashi-ngodwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-niiyo+:ashi-niiyow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-niizhwaaso+:ashi-niizhwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-nishwaaso+:ashi-nishwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-zhaangaso+:ashi-zhaangasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/bezhigo+:bezhigow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ingo+:ingow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/midaaso+:midaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ngo+:ngow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niizho+:niizhow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niiyo+:niiyow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niso+:nisow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niiwo+:niiwow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/nishwaaso+:nishwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
